Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 54
MEMORANDA OF ORE SALES

Section

34-54-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Person" means any person, partnership, association, or corporation.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 403, § 6.

C.L.

§ 3381.

CSA:

C. 110, § 273.

CRS 53:

§ 92-31-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-31-6.

34-54-102. Sale of ores and minerals.

It is unlawful for any person, whether acting for himself or as agent for another, to sell or to purchase any ores, concentrates, or amalgams bearing gold, silver, tungsten, vanadium, uranium, molybdenum, or other rare minerals, or to sell or purchase gold dust, gold or silver bullion, nuggets, or specimens of a value of ten dollars or more, unless at the time of the sale the vendor shall sign with his true name and deliver to the purchaser a memorandum in which he shall state the date of the sale, his residence, the nature and amount of the article sold, the source from which the vendor obtained the same, and the consideration actually paid.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 401, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3376.

CSA:

C. 110, § 268.

CRS 53:

§ 92-31-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-31-1.

34-54-103. Signed memorandum.

It is unlawful for any person, whether acting for himself or as agent for another, to deliver any of the property specified in section 34-54-102 of the value of ten dollars or more, to any other person as agent, broker, or bailee, unless he, at the time of such delivery, delivers to such agent, broker, or vendor a memorandum signed with his true name in which he shall state the date of the transaction, his residence, the nature and quantity of the property delivered, the source from which he obtained such property, and the purpose for which the delivery is made.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 402, § 2.

C.L.

§ 3377.

CSA:

C. 110, § 269.

CRS 53:

§ 92-31-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-31-2.

34-54-104. Preservation of memorandum.

Every person required to receive a memorandum under the provisions of this article shall carefully preserve the same for a period of at least twelve months.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 402, § 3.

C.L.

§ 3378.

CSA:

C. 110, § 270.

CRS 53:

§ 92-31-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-31-3.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 933, § 1, effective February 23.

34-54-105. Fictitious statement.

If any person required to execute a memorandum under the provisions of this article signs the same with any other than his true name, or makes any false statement whatsoever therein, he shall be deemed guilty of a violation of the provisions of this article. If any person required by the provisions of this article to receive a memorandum receives the memorandum knowing the same not to be signed with the true name of the person delivering such memorandum, or knowing any statement therein contained to be false, he shall be deemed guilty of a violation of the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 402, § 4.

C.L.

§ 3379.

CSA:

C. 110, § 271.

CRS 53:

§ 92-31-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-31-4.

34-54-106. Penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this article 54 commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 402, § 5.

C.L.

§ 3380.

CSA:

C. 110, § 272.

CRS 53:

§ 92-31-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-31-5.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3275, § 612, effective March 1, 2022.

34-54-107. Application of article. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 17:

p. 403, § 6.

C.L.

§ 3381.

CSA:

C. 110, § 273.

CRS 53:

§ 92-31-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-31-6.

L. 76:

Entire section repealed, p. 746, § 1, effective February 20.